Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 64 Military Justice
12-64-609. Fines and forfeitures.

Fines may be paid to a military court or to an officer executing its process.

The amount of a fine may be noted upon any state roll or account for pay of the delinquent and deducted from any pay or allowance due or thereafter to become due him or her, until the fine is liquidated.

Any sum so deducted shall be turned in to the military court which imposed the fine and shall be paid over by the officer receiving it in like manner as provided for other fines and moneys collected under a sentence of a summary court-martial.

Notwithstanding any other law, a fine or penalty imposed by a military court upon an officer or enlistee shall be paid by the officer collecting it within thirty (30) days to the Treasurer of State and shall become a part of, be credited to, and be spent from, the Department of the Military Fund.

The Treasurer of State shall then report the amount thereof to the Adjutant General and shall pay it over in appropriate warrant.

If a punishment of fine or forfeiture of an amount of base pay and allowance is imposed by a court-martial, the amount of the fine or forfeiture shall apply to any type or category of pay and allowances then due or becoming due on or after the date that the punishment is imposed before any deduction, withholding, assignment, previous forfeiture, or collection from the pay and allowances, and to any pay and allowances accrued before that date.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (c)(1), substituted “Treasurer of State” for “Treasurer of State of Arkansas” and “Department of the Military” for “State Military Department”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of the Military” for “State Military Department” throughout the section.

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Code of Military Justice, see Commentaries Volume B.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 211, § 23: Feb. 26, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the removal of officers whoare substandard in performance of duty or in conduct, deficient in character,or unsuited for military service is of paramount importance to the good orderand discipline of the Arkansas National Guard and security of the State ofArkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act beingimmediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 171; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-682; Acts 2007, No. 47, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 5541.

12-64-610. Delinquent fines or forfeitures.

(1)When a fine or forfeiture is delinquent for a period of ninety (90) days or more, the Department of the Military shall have a cause of action against the person and property liable for the delinquent portion of the fine or forfeiture, costs of collection, penalties, and interest to which the Department of the Military is entitled, plus a reasonable attorney's fee.

The Department of the Military shall have a lien on all property subject to forfeiture.

The action shall be brought in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

The judgment awarded the Department of the Military under this section shall be enforceable to the same extent and in the same manner as other civil judgments.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 27; 2019, No. 910, § 5542.

Subchapter 7

— Review of Courts-Martial

12-64-701. Initial action on the record.

After a trial by court-martial, the record shall be forwarded to the convening authority, as reviewing authority, and action thereon may be taken by the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being, a successor in command, or by the Governor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 106; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-661.

12-64-702. General court-martial records.

The convening authority shall refer the record of each general court-martial to the State Judge Advocate, who shall submit his or her written opinion thereon to the convening authority. If the final action of the court has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion shall be limited to questions of jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 107; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-662.

12-64-703. Reconsideration and revision.

If a specification before a court-martial has been dismissed on motion and the ruling does not amount to a finding of not guilty, the convening authority may return the record to the court for reconsideration of the ruling and any further appropriate action.

Where there is an apparent error or omission in the record or where the record shows improper or inconsistent action by a court-martial with respect to a finding or sentence which can be rectified without material prejudice to the substantial rights of the accused, the convening authority may return the record to the court for appropriate action.

In no case, however, may the record be returned:

For reconsideration of a finding of not guilty of any specification or a ruling which amounts to a finding of not guilty;

For reconsideration of a finding of not guilty of any charge, unless the record shows a finding of guilty under a specification laid under that charge, which sufficiently alleges a violation of some section of this code; or

For increasing the severity of the sentence unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

If the convening authority is the Governor, his or her action on the review of any record of trial is final.

(1)In all cases not convened by the Governor, if the sentence approved by the convening authority includes a dishonorable discharge, bad-conduct discharge, or dismissal, whether or not suspended, the entire record shall be sent to a staff judge advocate to be reviewed in the manner prescribed by the Governor.

All other court-martial records shall be sent to a judge advocate and shall be acted upon, transmitted, and disposed of as shall be prescribed by the Governor.

The State Judge Advocate shall review the record of trial in each case sent to him or her for review.

The State Judge Advocate shall take final action in any case reviewable by him or her.

In a case reviewable by the State Judge Advocate under this section, the State Judge Advocate may act only with respect to the findings and sentence as approved by the convening authority.

If the final action of the court-martial has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion of the State Judge Advocate shall be limited to questions of jurisdiction.

He or she may affirm only such findings of guilty, and the sentence or such part or amount of the sentence, as he or she finds correct in law and fact and determines, on the basis of the entire record, should be approved.

In considering the record, he or she may weigh the evidence, judge the credibility of witnesses, and determine controverted questions of fact, recognizing that the trial court saw and heard the witnesses.

If the State Judge Advocate sets aside the findings and sentence, he or she may, except where the setting aside is based on lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing.

If he or she sets aside the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, he or she shall order that the charges be dismissed.

In a case reviewable by the State Judge Advocate under this section, he or she shall instruct the convening authority to act in accordance with his or her decision on the review.

If he or she has ordered a rehearing but the convening authority finds a rehearing impracticable, he or she may dismiss the charges.

The State Judge Advocate:

May order one (1) or more boards of review, each composed of not less than three (3) commissioned officers of the organized militia, each of whom must be a member of the bar of the highest court of the state; and

Shall order a board of review to hear the appeal of any court-martial demanded under § 12-64-714.

Each board of review shall review the record of any trial by court-martial referred to it by the State Judge Advocate.

Boards of review have the same authority on review as the State Judge Advocate has under this section.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (b) and (c); inserted the (h)(1)(A) designation; added (h)(1)(B); and, in (h)(2), deleted “special” preceding “court-martial” and deleted “including a sentence to a bad conduct discharge” following “court-martial”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 108; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-663.

12-64-704. Review of records — Disposition.

The record and the opinion of the staff judge advocate or legal officer shall then be sent to the State Judge Advocate for review.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 111; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-666; Acts 2015, No. 1003, §§ 28, 29.

12-64-705. Approval by convening authority.

In acting on the findings and sentence of a court-martial, the convening authority may approve only such findings of guilty, and the sentence or such part or amount of the sentence, as he or she finds correct in law and fact and as he or she in his or her discretion determines should be approved. Unless he or she indicates otherwise, approval of the sentence is approval of the findings and sentence.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 110; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-665.

12-64-706. Error of law — Lesser included offense.

A finding or sentence of a court-martial may not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

Any reviewing authority with the power to approve or affirm a finding of guilty may approve or affirm so much of the finding as includes a lesser included offense.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 112; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-667.

12-64-707. Rehearings.

(1)If the convening authority disapproves the findings and sentence of a court-martial he or she may, except where there is lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing.

In such a case he or she shall state the reasons for disapproval.

If he or she disapproves the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, he or she shall dismiss the charges.

(1)Each rehearing shall take place before a court-martial composed of members not members of the court-martial which first heard the case.

Upon a rehearing the accused may not be tried for any offense of which he or she was found not guilty by the first court-martial; and no sentence in excess of or more severe than the original sentence may be imposed, unless the sentence is based upon a finding of guilty of an offense not considered upon the merits in the original proceedings or unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 109; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-664.

12-64-708. Change in sentence.

A convening authority may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted part of any sentence, including all uncollected forfeitures.

The Governor may, for good cause, substitute an administrative form of discharge for a discharge or dismissal executed in accordance with the sentence of a court-martial.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 116; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-671.

12-64-709. Vacation of suspension of sentence.

(1)Before the vacation of the suspension of a special court-martial sentence which as approved includes a bad-conduct discharge, or of any general court-martial sentence, the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer shall hold a hearing on the alleged violation of probation.

The probationer shall be represented at the hearing by counsel if he or she so desires.

The record of the hearing and the recommendation of the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction shall be sent for action to the Governor in cases involving a general court-martial sentence and to the commanding officer of the force of the organized militia of which the probationer is a member in all other cases covered by subsection (a) of this section.

If the Governor or commanding officer vacates the suspension, any unexecuted part of the sentence except a dismissal shall be executed.

The suspension of any other sentence may be vacated by any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 114; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-669.

12-64-710. Review counsel.

The accused has the right to be represented during a review of records under this subchapter by:

Civilian counsel if provided by the accused;

Military counsel of the accused's own selection if reasonably available; or

The defense counsel detailed under this code.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment added “or” at the end of (2).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 113; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-668; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 30; 2017, No. 250, § 30.

12-64-711. Finality of proceedings, findings, and sentences.

The proceedings, findings, and sentences of courts-martial as reviewed and approved, as required by this code, and all dismissals and discharges carried into execution under sentences by courts-martial following review and approval, as required herein, are final and conclusive.

Orders publishing the proceedings of courts-martial and all action taken pursuant to those proceedings are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the state, subject only to action upon a petition for a new trial or appeal as provided in this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (b), inserted “or appeal” and substituted “in this subchapter” for “herein”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 118; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-673; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 31.

12-64-712. Petition for a new trial.

At any time within two (2) years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence which extends to dismissal, dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge, the accused may petition the Governor for a new trial on ground of newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court-martial.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 115; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-670.

12-64-713. New trial — Effect on sentence.

Under such rules as the Governor may prescribe, all rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence which has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and such executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon the new trial or rehearing.

If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the Governor shall substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of his or her enlistment.

If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the Governor shall substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue, and the commissioned officer dismissed by that sentence may be reappointed by the Governor alone to such commissioned grade and with such rank as in the opinion of the Governor that former officer would have attained had he or she not been dismissed.

The reappointment of such a former officer may be made if a position vacancy is available under applicable tables of organization.

All times between the dismissal and the reappointment shall be considered as service for all purposes.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

The Arkansas Rules of Appellate Procedure-Criminal shall apply to all appeals to the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals under this code.

When an accused has exhausted all other rights of review with the organized militia, the accused may appeal the conviction and sentence of any court-martial that does not sentence the accused to incarceration to a board of review as provided under §12-64-704.

The proceedings for an appeal shall be initiated by filing a notice of appeal with the Adjutant General. The notice of appeal shall be served on the Adjutant General personally or by certified mail. It shall be unnecessary to serve other parties. Any appeal shall be filed with the Adjutant General no more than thirty (30) days after the effective date of the sentence under § 12-64-604.

The record of any court-martial conviction and sentence appealed shall be lodged in the office of the clerk of the court within the time prescribed by law or court rule for filing an appeal of a criminal conviction in a circuit court in this state, and not thereafter, and only after the party appealing has paid to the Adjutant General the costs for preparation of the certified transcripts and to the military court clerk the filing costs, except for paupers as provided for by the appellate court rules.

In all cases of appeal to the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals, the appeal shall be taken on the record in the case, consisting of pertinent documents and papers, any transcript of evidence, and the findings and orders. The appellate jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals shall extend only to questions of law, as in criminal cases appealed from the circuit courts.

Upon request of the defendant and a showing of indigency, the State Judge Advocate may appoint an attorney having the qualifications prescribed in § 12-64-410 to represent the defendant in the appeal of his or her court-martial conviction and sentence to the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals.

On an appeal under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the state shall be represented by the Attorney General or his or her designee.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “to Supreme Court or Court of Appeals” following “Appeal” in the section heading; redesignated (a) as (a)(1)(A) and inserted designations (i) and (ii); in the introductory language of (a)(1)(A), substituted “other” for “of his”, substituted “the accused” for “he”, and inserted “that sentences the accused to incarceration”; added (a)(1)(B) and (a)(2); deleted “State” preceding “Adjutant” throughout (b); added “except for paupers as provided for by the appellate court rules” in (c); in (e), inserted “and a showing of indigency” and deleted “(c)” following “§12-64-410”; and, in (f), deleted “Indigent defendants shall have the same right to appointed appellate defense counsel as accused persons not in the military” at the beginning and inserted “under subdivision (a)(1) of this section”.

The 2019 amendment, in (c), substituted “certified transcripts” for “transcript” and inserted “military”.

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Code of Military Justice, see Commentaries Volume B.

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 412, § 5: Mar. 13, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Governor should be granted the authority to designate certain military officers to administer the Oath of Enlistment to new members of the militia; that the crimes of assault and aggravated assault should be specifically provided for by the Military Code; that the jurisdiction of general, special, and summary courts-martial should be clarified; and that this act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 47, § 11: Feb. 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are many members of the Arkansas National Guard and Reserves that are serving in active duty in Iraq and Afghanistan in the war on terror; that it is critical that Arkansas law be updated and be consistent with federal law and rules; and that this act is necessary to eliminate confusion regarding out-dated and inconsistent provisions in the Military Code of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 211, § 23: Feb. 26, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the removal of officers whoare substandard in performance of duty or in conduct, deficient in character,or unsuited for military service is of paramount importance to the good orderand discipline of the Arkansas National Guard and security of the State ofArkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act beingimmediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 117; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-672; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 960.

12-64-714. Appeal.

(1)(A)When an accused has exhausted all other rights of review within the organized militia, the accused may appeal a conviction and sentence of a court-martial that sentences the accused to incarceration to:

The Supreme Court; or

If the rules of the Supreme Court provide, the Court of Appeals.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 125, § 14; 2015, No. 1003, § 32; 2019, No. 211, § 19.

Subchapter 8

— Punitive Articles

12-64-801. Persons to be tried or punished.

A person shall not be tried or punished for any offense provided for in this code unless the offense was committed while in a duty status or in conjunction with a fraudulent or unlawful enlistment or appointment.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 119; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-701; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 33.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “A person shall not” for “No person may”, substituted “the offense” for “it”, deleted “he was” preceding “in a duty status”, and added “or in conjunction with a fraudulent or unlawful enlistment or appointment”.

12-64-802. Principals.

Any person subject to this code is a principal, if he or she:

Commits an offense punishable by this code, or aids, abets, counsels, commands, or procures its commission; or

Causes an act to be done which if directly performed by him or her, would be punishable by this code.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 120; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-702.

12-64-803. Accessory after the fact.

Any person subject to this code who, knowing that an offense punishable by this code has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent his or her apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 121; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-703.

12-64-804. Conviction of lesser included offense.

An accused may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included in the offense charged or of an attempt to commit either the offense charged or an offense necessarily included therein.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 122; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-704.

12-64-805. Attempts.

An act, done with specific intent to commit an offense under this code, amounting to more than mere preparation and tending, even though failing to effect its commission, is an attempt to commit that offense.

Any person subject to this code who attempts to commit any offense punishable by this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed.

Any person subject to this code may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears on the trial that the offense was consummated.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 123; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-705.

12-64-806. Conspiracy.

Any person subject to this code who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this code shall, if one (1) or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 124; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-706.

12-64-807. Solicitation.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if with the purpose of promoting or facilitating the commission of a specific offense, the person commands, urges, or requests another person to engage in specific conduct that would:

Constitute that offense;

Constitute an attempt to commit that offense;

Cause the result specified by the definition of that offense; or

Establish the other person's complicity in the commission or attempted commission of that offense.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that the defendant prevented the commission of the offense solicited under circumstances manifesting a voluntary and complete renunciation of the defendant's criminal purpose.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

Procures his or her own enlistment or appointment in the organized militia by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

Procures his or her own separation from the organized militia by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her eligibility for that separation.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b).

Without being regularly separated from one (1) of the forces of the organized militia enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one of the forces of the organized militia without fully disclosing the fact that he or she has not been regularly separated.

Any person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 125; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-707; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 34.

12-64-808. Fraudulent or unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she:

Any person subject to this code who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the organized militia of any person who is known to him or her to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, rule, or order shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, §§ 126, 127; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-708, 11-709; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 961.

12-64-809. Desertion.

Any member of the organized militia is guilty of desertion if he or she:

Without authority goes or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to remain away therefrom permanently;

Quits his or her unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important services; or

Any commissioned officer of the organized militia who, after tender of his or her resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his or her post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away therefrom permanently is guilty of desertion.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 128; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-710.

12-64-810. Absence without leave.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she, without authority:

Fails to go to his or her appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

Goes from that place; or

Absents himself or herself or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty at which he or she is required to be at the time prescribed.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 129; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-711.

12-64-811. Missing movement.

Any person subject to this code who through neglect or design misses the movement of a military unit with which he or she is required in the course of duty to move shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 130; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-712.

12-64-812. Contempt towards officials.

Any person subject to this code who uses contemptuous words against the President, the Governor, the General Assembly, or the governor or legislature of any state, territory, commonwealth, or possession wherein that person may be serving shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 131; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-713.

12-64-813. Disrespect towards superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who behaves with disrespect towards his or her superior commissioned officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 132; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-714.

12-64-814. Assault generally.

A person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she unlawfully and with force or violence:

Attempts to do bodily harm to another person;

Offers to do bodily harm to another person; or

Does bodily harm to another person.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she unlawfully and with force or violence” for “who attempts, or offers with unlawful force or violence to do bodily harm to another person, whether or not the attempt or offer is consummated is guilty of assault and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct” in the introductory language; added (1), (2) and (3), and made a stylistic change.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 133; 1983, No. 412, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-715; Acts 2019, No. 211, § 20.

12-64-815. Assaulting or willfully disobeying superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she:

Strikes his or her superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against him or her while he or she is in the execution of his or her office; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful command of his or her superior commissioned officer.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 133; 1983, No. 412, § 2; 1985, No. 670, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-715.

12-64-816. Insubordinate conduct towards any noncommissioned officer.

Any enlisted member shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she:

Strikes or assaults a noncommissioned officer while that noncommissioned officer is in the execution of his or her office;

Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a noncommissioned officer; or

Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment towards a noncommissioned officer while that noncommissioned officer is in the execution of his or her office.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 134; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-716.

12-64-817. Failure to obey order or rule.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she:

Violates or fails to obey any lawful order or rule. A lawful order or rule is a written, electronic, nonverbal or oral communication by a member of the armed forces acting within the scope of official military duties regarding instruction, decision, rule, judgment, directive, procedure, statement or command, and which primarily affects the action, organization, training, good order, discipline, property, welfare, administration, operation, and procedure of the armed forces.

Lawful orders and rules shall not be subject to the requirements of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;

Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the organized militia, which it is his or her duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

Is derelict in the performance of his or her duties.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in the section heading and twice in (1)(A); and made a similar change in (1)(B).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 135; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-717; Acts 1993, No. 926, § 1; 1993, No. 1035, § 1;
2019, No. 315, § 962.

12-64-818. Cruelty and maltreatment.

Any person subject to this code who is guilty of cruelty toward or oppression or maltreatment of any person subject to his or her orders shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 136; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-718.

12-64-819. Mutiny or sedition.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of mutiny if he or she, with intent to usurp or override lawful military authority refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or otherwise do his or her duty or creates any violence or disturbance.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of sedition if he or she, with intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence, or other disturbance against that authority.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition if he or she fails to do his or her utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in his or her presence, or fails to take all reasonable means to inform his or her superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition which he or she knows or has reason to believe is taking place.

A person who is found guilty of attempted mutiny, mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 137; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-719.

12-64-820. Resistance, break of arrest, and escape.

A person subject to this code who resists apprehension or breaks arrest or who escapes from physical restraint, custody, or confinement lawfully imposed shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 138; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-720; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 35.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “custody, or confinement”.

12-64-821. Releasing prisoner without proper authority.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority, releases any prisoner committed to his or her charge, or who through neglect or design suffers any such prisoner to escape, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 139; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-721.

12-64-822. Unlawful detention of another.

Any person subject to this code who, except as provided by law or regulation, apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 140; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-722.

12-64-823. Noncompliance with procedural rules.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she:

Is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this code; or

Knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this code regulating the proceedings before, during, or after trial of an accused.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 141; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-723.

12-64-824. Misbehavior before the enemy.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she, before or in the presence of the enemy:

Runs away;

Shamefully abandons, surrenders, or delivers up any command, unit, place, or military property which it is his or her duty to defend;

Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place, or military property;

Casts away his or her arms or ammunition;

Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

Quits his or her place of duty to plunder or pillage;

Causes false arms in any command, unit, or place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia;

Willfully fails to do his or her utmost to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy any enemy troops, combatants, vessels, aircraft, or any other thing, which it is his or her duty so to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy; or

Does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the armed forces belonging to the United States or their allies, to this state, or to any other state, when engaged in battle.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 142; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-724.

12-64-825. Subordinate compelling surrender.

Any person subject to this code who compels or attempts to compel the commander of any force of the organized militia of this state, or of any other state, to give it up to an enemy or to abandon it, or who strikes the colors or flag to an enemy without proper authority, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 143; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-725.

12-64-826. Improper use of countersign.

Any person subject to this code who in time of war discloses the parole or countersign to any person not entitled to receive it, or who gives to another who is entitled to receive and use the parole or countersign, a different parole or countersign from that which, to his or her knowledge, he or she was authorized and required to give, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 144; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-726.

12-64-827. Captured or abandoned property.

All persons subject to this code shall secure all public property taken from the enemy for the service of the State of Arkansas or the United States and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody, or control.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she:

Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (a) of this section;

Buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of captured or abandoned property, whereby he or she receives or expects any profit, benefit, or advantage to himself or herself or another directly or indirectly connected with himself or herself; or

Engages in looting or pillaging.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 145; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-727.

12-64-828. Aiding the enemy.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she:

Aids, or attempts to aid, the enemy with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other things; or

Without proper authority, knowingly harbors or protects or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with or holds an intercourse with the enemy, either directly or indirectly.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 146; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-728.

12-64-829. Misconduct as a prisoner.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she, while in the hands of the enemy in time of war:

For the purpose of securing favorable treatment by his or her captors, acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, rule, or regulation, to the detriment of other of whatever nationality held by the enemy as civilian or military prisoners; or

While in a position of authority over such persons, maltreats them without justifiable cause.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “rule” in (1).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 147; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-729; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 963.